tr: Kontrol edilen parazit türleri: Askaritler; At sineği larvaları; Büyük strongilüsler; Akciğer kurtları; Kıl kurtları; Küçük strongilüsler; Şerit solucanlar; İplik kurtları; Diğer
en: Parasite types controlled: Ascarids; Bots; Large strongyles; Lungworms; Pinworms; Small strongyles; Tapeworms; Threadworms; Other
es: Tipos de parásitos controlados: Ascáridos; Reznos; Grandes estróngilos; Gusanos pulmonares; Oxiuros; Pequeños estróngilos; Tenias; Gusanos cilíndricos; Otro
hr-HR: Kontrolirane vrste parazita: Askaridi; Štrkovi; Veliki strongilidi; Plućni vlasci; Oksiuridi; Mali strongilidi; Trakavice; Nematodi; Ostalo
cs: Kontrolované typy parazitů: Škrkavky; Střečci; Velcí strongylidé; Plicnivky; Roupi; Malí strongylidé; Tasemnice; Háděta; Jiné
fi: Torjuttavat loistyypit: Suolinkaiset; Kiiliäiset; Suuret sukkulamadot; Keuhkomadot; Kihomadot; Pienet sukkulamadot; Heisimadot; Rihmamadot; Muu
ja: 制御された寄生虫のタイプ: 回虫; ウマバエ; 大円虫; 肺虫; ギョウチュウ; 小円虫; 条虫; 糸状虫; その他
hu: Kezelt paraziták típusai: Orsóférgek; Bagócsok; Nagy strongylusok; Tüdőférgek; Hegyférgek; Kis strongylusok; Galandférgek; Fonálférgek; Egyéb
nl: Parasiettypen bestreden: Spoelwormen; Horzels; Grote bloedwormen; Longwormen; Aarsmaden; Kleine bloedwormen; Lintwormen; Draadwormen; Overig
ru: Типы контролируемых паразитов: Аскариды; Оводы; Крупные стронгилиды; Легочные гельминты; Острицы; Мелкие стронгилиды; Ленточные черви; Нитевидные черви; Другое
de: Bekämpfte Parasitenarten: Spulwürmer; Dasselfliegenlarven; Große Strongyliden; Lungenwürmer; Madenwürmer; Kleine Strongyliden; Bandwürmer; Fadenwürmer; Sonstige
sk-SK: Druhy parazitov, proti ktorým pôsobí: Škrkavky; Strečky; Veľké strongylidy; Pľúcnivky; Mrle; Malé strongylidy; Pásomnice; Vlasovce; Iné
pt-BR: Tipos de parasitas controlados: Ascarídeos; Larvas de mosca; Estrongilídeos grandes; Vermes pulmonares; Oxiúros; Estrongilídeos pequenos; Tênias; Vermes filiformes; Outro
zh-CN: 可防治的寄生虫类型: 蛔虫; 胃蝇; 大型圆线虫; 肺丝虫; 蛲虫; 小型圆线虫; 绦虫; 丝状线虫; 其他
sv: Kontrollerade parasittyper: Spolmaskar; Styngflugelarver; Stora blodmaskar; Lungmaskar; Springmaskar; Små blodmaskar; Bandmaskar; Trådmaskar; Övrigt
it: Tipi di parassiti controllati: Ascaridi; Gasterofili; Grandi strongili; Strongili polmonari; Ossiuri; Piccoli strongili; Tenie; Strongiloidi; Altro
zh-TW: 防治寄生蟲類型: 蛔蟲; 胃蠅; 大型圓線蟲; 肺蟲; 蟯蟲; 小型圓線蟲; 絛蟲; 絲蟲; 其他
th: ชนิดของปรสิตที่ถูกควบคุม: พยาธิไส้เดือน; พยาธิตัวอ่อนแมลงวัน; พยาธิสตรองไจล์ขนาดใหญ่; พยาธิปอด; พยาธิเข็มหมุด; พยาธิสตรองไจล์ขนาดเล็ก; พยาธิตัวตืด; พยาธิเส้นด้าย; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipos de parasitas controlados: Ascarídeos; Larvas; Estrongilídeos grandes; Vermes pulmonares; Oxiúros; Estrongilídeos pequenos; Ténias; Nematódeos; Outro
da: Parasittype, der skal behandles: Spolorm; Bremser; Store strongylider; Lungeorm; Børneorm; Små strongylider; Bændelorm; Trådorm; Andre
nb: Type parasitter som bekjempes: Spolormer; Brems; Store blodormer; Lungeormer; Haleormer; Små blodormer; Bendelormer; Trådormer; Annet
bg-BG: Типове паразити, срещу които действа продуктът: Аскариди; Оводи; Големи стронгили; Белодробни нематоди; Острици; Малки стронгили; Тении; Нишковидни червеи; Друго
sl-SI: Nadzorovane vrste zajedavcev: Gliste; Ličinke zoljev; Veliki strongilidi; Pljučne gliste; Podančice; Mali strongilidi; Trakulje; Nitaste gliste; Drugo
el: Είδη παρασίτων που ελέγχονται: Ασκαρίδες; Οίστροι; Μεγάλοι στρόγγυλοι; Πνευμονοσκώληκες; Οξύουροι; Μικροί στρόγγυλοι; Ταινίες; Νηματώδεις σκώληκες; Άλλο
fr: Types de parasites ciblés: Ascaris; Oestres; Grands strongles; Vers pulmonaires; Oxyures; Petits strongles; Ténias; Anguillules; Autre
lt-LT: Kontroliuojamų parazitų tipai: Askaridės; Gyliai; Didieji strongilidai; Plaučių kirmėlės; Spalinės; Mažieji strongilidai; Kaspinuočiai; Siūlinės kirmėlės; Kita
ro-RO: Tipurile de paraziți controlați: Ascarizi; Larve de muște; Strongili mari; Viermi pulmonari; Oxiuri; Strongili mici; Tenii; Viermi filiformi; Altele
ko: 방제 대상 기생충 유형: 회충; 말파리 유충; 대원충; 폐충; 요충; 소원충; 촌충; 분선충; 기타
vi: Các loại ký sinh trùng được kiểm soát: Giun đũa; Ấu trùng ruồi; Giun lươn lớn; Giun phổi; Giun kim; Giun lươn nhỏ; Sán dây; Giun chỉ; Khác
pl: Typy zwalczanych pasożytów: Glisty; Gzy; Słupkowce duże; Nicienie płucne; Owsiki; Słupkowce małe; Tasiemce; Węgorki; Inne